Georgia, session 2025_26, HB307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
31 PART I
32 SECTION 1-1.
33 Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education, is amended in
34 Part 3 of Article 6 of Chapter 2, relating to educational programs under the "Quality Basic
35 Education Act," by revising subsection (c) of Code Section 20-2-153, relating to early
36 intervention program for students at risk of not reaching or maintaining academic grade level,
37 as follows:
38 "(c) The State Board of Education shall describe by rules and regulations such additional
39 services, resources, support, or strategies as may be provided by the local school system.
40 The specifications for delivery of early intervention services shall be the responsibility of
41 local boards of education except that the program rules and regulations adopted by the
42 State Board of Education shall be followed in designing the program delivery models.
- 2 -

25 LC 49 2352S
43 Delivery models may include, but are not limited to, class augmentation, pull-out or
44 self-contained classes, and the Reading Recovery Program delivered by certificated
45 personnel."
46 SECTION 1-2.
47 Said title is further amended in said part by revising Code Section 20-2-153.1, relating to
48 Georgia Early Literacy, uniform grade appropriate metrics to measure literacy, universal
49 reading screeners, high-quality instructional materials aligned with the science of reading,
50 support for literacy instruction, and reading intervention plans, as follows:
51 "20-2-153.1.
52 (a) This Code section shall be known and may be cited as the 'Georgia Early Literacy and
53 Dyslexia Act.'
54 (b) As used in this Code section, the term:
55 (1) 'Board' means the State Board of Education.
56 (1.1)(2) 'Center' means the Sandra Dunagan Deal Center for Early Language and
57 Literacy.
58 (3) 'Characteristics of dyslexia' means persistent weaknesses in one or more areas of
59 foundational reading skills and inadequate response to targeted intervention that indicates
60 a need for more intensive intervention.
61 (1.2)(4) 'Council' means the Georgia Council on Literacy.
62 (2)(5) 'Department' means the Department of Education.
63 (3)(6) 'Dyslexia' means a specific learning disability that is neurological in origin.
64 Dyslexia is characterized by difficulties with accurate or fluent word recognition and by
65 poor spelling and decoding abilities. These difficulties typically result from a deficit in
66 the phonological component of language that is often unexpected in relation to other
67 cognitive abilities and the provision of effective classroom instruction. Secondary
- 3 -

25 LC 49 2352S
68 consequences may include problems in reading comprehension and reduced reading
69 experience that can impede the growth of vocabulary and background knowledge.
70 (7) 'Foundational literacy skills' means phonological awareness, phonemic awareness,
71 alphabet knowledge, phonics, oral reading fluency, spelling, vocabulary, reading
72 comprehension, spelling, oral language, and the intersection of reading and writing rapid
73 automatized naming.
74 (4)(8) 'High-quality instructional materials' means instructional materials aligned to the
75 science of reading that instruct students in foundational literacy skills and
76 grade-appropriate English language arts and reading standards approved by the State
77 Board of Education board. Instructional materials that feature or promote the use of the
78 three-cueing system shall not constitute high-quality instructional materials.
79 (9) 'Parent' or 'guardian' means an individual who has legal authority to act on behalf of
80 a child as a natural or adoptive parent, a legal guardian, or a legal agent. Such term shall
81 also include a kinship caregiver, as such term is defined in Code Section 20-1-15.
82 (5)(10) 'Reading intervention' means evidence based strategies frequently used to
83 remediate reading deficiencies and includes, but is not limited to, individual and
84 small-group instruction, multisensory approaches, tutoring, mentoring, or the use of
85 technology that targets specific reading skills and abilities.
86 (6)(11) 'Science of reading' means the body of research that identifies evidence based
87 approaches of explicitly and systematically teaching students to read, including
88 foundational literacy skills that enable students to develop reading skills required to meet
89 state standards in literacy.
90 (7)(12) 'Significantly at risk of not attaining grade level reading proficiency' 'Significant
91 reading deficiency' means for students in kindergarten through third grade that such
92 student's score on a universal reading screener is within the range of scores determined
93 by the department to demonstrate a lack of proficiency in foundational literacy skills
94 foundational literacy skills, as measured by scores on a universal reading screener and
- 4 -

25 LC 49 2352S
95 other quantitative and qualitative data, indicate that the student is at high risk of not
96 attaining grade level reading proficiency.
97 (8)(13) 'Structured literacy' means an evidence based approach to teaching oral and
98 written language aligned to the science of reading founded on the science of how children
99 learn to read and characterized by explicit, systematic, cumulative, and diagnostic
100 instruction in phonology, sound-symbol association, syllable instruction, morphology,
101 syntax, and semantics. An approach to teaching oral and written language that features
102 or promotes the three-cueing system shall not constitute structured literacy.
103 (14) 'Three-cueing system' means any model for teaching students word reading based
104 on meaning, structure and syntax, and visual cues. Such models are also referred to as
105 'MSV.'
106 (9)(15) 'Tiered reading intervention plan' means a plan that describes the evidence based
107 reading intervention services a student will receive to remediate such student's reading
108 deficit and to ensure that such student becomes proficient support the student in reaching
109 grade level proficiency in foundational literacy skills.
110 (10)(16) 'Universal reading screener' means a uniform tool that screens and monitors a
111 student's progress in foundational literacy skills that is administered to students multiple
112 times during the school year.
113 (c)(1) The board, in consultation with the department and the Office of Student
114 Achievement, shall establish such policies, rules, and regulations as necessary to
115 implement uniform grade-appropriate metrics for measuring literacy.
116 (2) As soon as practicable but not later than January 1, 2024, the board shall:
117 (A) Approve high-quality instructional materials to be used for teaching students in
118 kindergarten through third grade to read; and
119 (B) Establish a procedure for each public school and local school system to annually
120 certify to the department that such school or school system's locally approved
- 5 -

25 LC 49 2352S
121 instructional materials and content, as defined in subsection (a) of Code
122 Section 20-2-1017, constitute high-quality instructional materials.
123 (3)(A) As soon as practicable but not later than January 1, 2024, the department shall
124 establish Every three years beginning in 2027, the center shall review and update, as
125 appropriate, qualifications, time lines timelines, and submission procedures for
126 education service providers to submit one or more universal reading screeners to be
127 considered for inclusion on the board's list of approved universal reading screener
128 providers provided for in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.
129 (B) As soon as practicable but not later than May 15, 2025, the board shall approve the
130 memorandum of agreement between the council and the department, as provided for
131 in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (4) of this subsection, for a list of no more than five
132 universal reading screeners, one of which shall be a free universal reading screener, for
133 use by public schools and local school systems as part of their comprehensive literacy
134 programs which meet the following criteria:
135 (i) Capable of providing relevant information to assist teachers with targeting
136 instruction based on student needs;
137 (ii) Capable of measuring foundational literacy skills;
138 (iii) Capable of identifying students who have a significant reading deficiency are
139 significantly at risk of not attaining grade level reading proficiency, including, but not
140 limited to, identifying students with characteristics of dyslexia;
141 (iv) Prescribed parameters on the time required to administer a universal reading
142 screener with the primary objective of such prescription being to minimize impacts
143 on instructional time; and
144 (v) Capable of progress monitoring.
145 (4)(A) As soon as practicable but not later than By July 15, 2025 each year, the
146 department shall publish on its public website the free universal reading screener and
147 the list of other approved universal reading screeners, one of which each public school
- 6 -

25 LC 49 2352S
148 and local school system shall adopt and administer in order to comply with the
149 requirements of subparagraph (d)(3)(C) of this Code section (B) of paragraph (3) of this
150 subsection.
151 (B) The council, in collaboration with the center and the Office of Planning and
152 Budget, shall identify a free universal reading screener that meets the criteria
153 established by the board as provided in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of this
154 subsection. The council shall enter into a memorandum of agreement with the
155 department to make such universal reading screener available for use free of charge to
156 public schools and local school systems.
157 (5) The department shall publish on its public website and distribute by July 15 each year
158 by electronic means to each local school system and public school in this state a dyslexia
159 informational handbook that includes guidance, technical assistance, and training to assist
160 all schools in the implementation of evidence based practices for instructing students with
161 characteristics of dyslexia. Such handbook shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
162 following information:
163 (A) Evidence based practices designed specifically for students with characteristics of
164 dyslexia;
165 (B) Guidance on developing support plans for students with characteristics of dyslexia;
166 (C) A list and brief description of the dyslexia related training programs accredited by
167 the International Dyslexia Association and any other nationally or internationally
168 recognized accrediting organization; and
169 (D) A list of dyslexia endorsement programs approved by the Professional Standards
170 Commission.
171 (6) The department shall, in consultation with the University System of Georgia, the
172 Professional Standards Commission, the Office of Student Achievement, Georgia's
173 Regional Education Service Agencies regional education service agencies, and literacy
174 experts, develop or procure one or more training programs for kindergarten through third
- 7 -

25 LC 49 2352S
175 grade teachers on the science of reading, structured literacy, and foundational literacy
176 skills that enable students to develop reading skills required to meet state standards in
177 literacy. Such training programs shall be developed or procured to promote teachers'
178 knowledge and skills for teaching all students to read, including students with dyslexia,
179 and to ensure teachers have the knowledge and skills necessary to use approved universal
180 reading screeners and to use assessment data to inform instruction based on student
181 needs.
182 (6)(7) The department shall provide technical assistance to aid public schools and local
183 school systems in implementing the provisions of this Code section.
184 (7)(8)(A) Beginning April 1, 2026, the department shall provide an annual report on
185 the impacts of the implementation of the provisions of this Code section, including, but
186 not limited to, reporting the results by school and school system of:
187 (A) The research based formative assessments with a summative component that is
188 tied to performance indicators in English language arts and reading in grades one and
189 two provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-281;
190 (B)(i) The comprehensive summative assessment program for third grade students
191 provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-281; and
192 (C) The nationally norm-referenced instruments in reading for third grade students
193 provided for in subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-281; and
194 (D)(ii) The formative reading assessments for first and second grade students
195 provided for in Code Section 20-2-280.
196 (B) Such report shall also include analyses of the impact of use of universal reading
197 screeners, the use of high-quality instructional materials, and instructional practices
198 grounded in the science of reading. Such report shall be provided to the Governor, the
199 President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the chairperson
200 of the House Committee on Education, the Senate Education and Youth Committee, the
201 House Committee on Higher Education, the Senate Higher Education Committee, and
- 8 -

25 LC 49 2352S
202 the board, and shall be made available on the department's public website for access by
203 the public.
204 (d)(1) Local boards of education and public school governing bodies shall by August 1
205 each year:
206 (A) Approve By December 1, 2024, approve high-quality instructional materials for
207 students in kindergarten through third grade; and
208 (B) Certify By December 15, 2024, and by August 1 each year thereafter, certify to the
209 department that its locally approved instructional materials and content, as defined in
210 subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-1017, constitute high-quality instructional
211 materials.;
212 (C) Report to the department the total number and percentage of students in
213 kindergarten through third grade who were identified during the previous school year
214 as having characteristics of dyslexia, including, but not limited to, total numbers and
215 percentages by grade level; and
216 (D) Certify in writing to the department that a copy of the dyslexia informational
217 handbook provided for in paragraph (5) of subsection (c) of this Code section has been
218 distributed by electronic means to each school administrator, teacher, and other school
219 personnel employed by such local school system or public school.
220 (2)(A) Each public school and local school system shall provide instructional support
221 for kindergarten through third grade teachers that shall include:
222 (i) Onsite teacher training on the science of reading, structured literacy, foundational
223 literacy skills, and evidence based decision making;
224 (ii) Demonstrated lessons; and
225 (iii) Prompt feedback for improving instruction.
226 (B)(i) Any public school or local school system claiming that a lack of sufficient
227 funding prevents such public school or local school system from providing
228 instructional support as required in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph shall promptly
- 9 -

25 LC 49 2352S
229 and in writing notify the Department of Education department and shall describe all
230 efforts such school or school system has undertaken to secure sufficient funding from
231 local, state, federal, and private sources.
232 (ii) The Department of Education department shall provide technical assistance and
233 other guidance to public schools and local schools systems in identifying local, state,
234 federal, and private funding sources to provide for instructional support as required
235 in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
236 (3)(A) Three Beginning August 1, 2024, three times each school year each public
237 school and local school system shall administer a universal reading screener to each
238 student in kindergarten through third grade, with the first administration occurring
239 within 30 school days of the beginning of the school year; provided, however, that for
240 students in first and second grades such public school or local school system shall be
241 authorized to substitute one administration of a universal reading screener with an
242 administration of a formative reading assessment as provided for in Code
243 Section 20-2-280.
244 (B) Reserved.
245 (C) After each administration of a universal reading screener, each public school or
246 local school system shall report the results to:
247 (i) Parents and guardians of students who participated in the administration; and
248 (ii) The department for analysis.
249 (D)(C) The results of the universal reading screeners administered to students shall not
250 be used as part of any education assessment accountability program provided for in
251 Article 2 of Chapter 14 of this title.
252 (4)(A) Beginning August 1, 2024, public schools and local school systems shall
253 implement tiered reading intervention plans for public school students in kindergarten
254 through third grade who at any time during the school year exhibit a significant reading
255 deficiency are determined to be significantly at risk of not attaining grade level reading
- 10 -

25 LC 49 2352S
256 proficiency, as measured by performance on a universal reading screener approved by
257 the board and other qualitative and quantitative data. Each such tiered reading
258 intervention plan shall be implemented no later than 30 school days after a student such
259 determination has been made identified as exhibiting a significant reading deficiency
260 and shall describe the evidence based reading intervention services the student will
261 receive to remedy the reading deficit address the student's difficulties and ensure the
262 student becomes proficient in foundational literacy skills. Such tiered reading
263 intervention plans may should be incorporated into and included as part of the school's
264 existing multi-tiered multitiered system of supports or response to intervention
265 frameworks.
266 (B) Each student who has been identified as exhibiting a significant reading deficiency
267 determined to be significantly at risk of not attaining grade level reading proficiency
268 shall receive intensive reading intervention until such student is determined to no longer
269 identified as exhibiting a significant reading deficiency be significantly at risk of not
270 attaining grade level reading proficiency.
271 (C) The parent or guardian of any student in kindergarten through third grade who at
272 any time during the school year exhibits a significant reading deficiency has been
273 determined to be significantly at risk of not attaining grade level reading proficiency
274 shall be notified in writing by the student's school no later than 15 school days after
275 such determination has been made the identification of the possible deficiency. Such
276 written notification shall include:
277 (i) That the student has been identified as exhibiting a significant reading deficiency
278 determined to be significantly at risk of not attaining grade level reading proficiency;
279 (ii) That a tiered reading intervention plan will be implemented by the student's
280 teacher an educator at the student's school;
281 (iii) Results of the student's performance on the universal reading screeners
282 administered to date and other data used to make such determination;
- 11 -

25 LC 49 2352S
283 (iv) A description of the current services provided to the student;
284 (v) A description of proposed evidence based reading interventions and supplemental
285 instructional services and supports to be provided to the student that are designed to
286 remedy the identified area or areas of significant reading deficiency in which the
287 student is significantly at risk of not attaining grade level reading proficiency to
288 ensure the student becomes proficient in foundational literacy skills;
289 (vi) Notification that the parent or guardian will be informed in writing of the
290 student's progress toward grade level reading; and
291 (vii) Strategies for parents and guardians to use at home to help their child succeed
292 in reading.
293 (D) For each student who has been determined to be significantly at risk of not
294 attaining grade level reading proficiency and who does not make adequate progress
295 toward grade level reading despite receiving evidence based reading interventions and
296 supplemental instructional services and supports, additional quantitative and qualitative
297 data shall be collected and examined in conjunction with universal reading screener
298 data to identify whether the student may have characteristics of dyslexia.
299 (5) The parent or guardian of any student in kindergarten through third grade who at any
300 time during the school year is identified as having characteristics of dyslexia shall be
301 notified in writing by the student's school no later than 15 school days after the
302 identification. Such written notification shall include:
303 (A) That the student has been identified as having characteristics of dyslexia;
304 (B) That a support plan for students with characteristics of dyslexia will be
305 implemented by the student's teacher;
306 (C) A description of the qualitative and quantitative data used to make the
307 identification, including the student's rate of progress toward grade level reading with
308 prior intervention support;
- 12 -

25 LC 49 2352S
309 (D) A description of proposed changes or additions to the evidence based reading
310 interventions and supplemental instructional services and supports to be provided to the
311 student that are designed to ensure the student becomes proficient in foundational
312 literacy skills;
313 (E) Notification that the parent or guardian will be informed in writing of the student's
314 progress toward grade level reading;
315 (F) Information and resource material regarding dyslexia;
316 (G) Strategies for parents and guardians to use at home to help their child succeed in
317 reading; and
318 (H) Notification that the parent or guardian shall have the right to elect, in writing, that
319 the student not receive the support plan and the proposed changes or additions to the
320 evidence based reading interventions and supplemental instructional services and
321 supports.
322 (6)(A) No local school system or public school shall use a program of foundational
323 skills instruction for students in kindergarten through third grade that is based on any
324 curriculum, instructional materials, instructional practices, or other interventions that
325 utilize the three-cueing systems model for teaching word reading.
326 (B) Each local school system and public school shall ensure that all instructional
327 materials used to teach students in kindergarten through third grade:
328 (i) Are high-quality instructional materials; and
329 (ii) Do not utilize the three-cueing system model for teaching word reading.
330 (C) Instruction in public schools and local school systems shall not employ the
331 three-cueing system or visual memory as a basis for teaching word reading. Instruction
332 may include visual information and strategies which improve background and
333 experiential knowledge, add context, and increase oral language and vocabulary to
334 support comprehension, but shall not be used to teach word reading.
- 13 -

25 LC 49 2352S
335 (5)(7) By July August 1, 2025, all kindergarten through third grade teachers shall
336 complete a training program developed or procured pursuant to paragraph (c)(5) (6) of
337 subsection (c) of this Code section.
338 (e)(1) There is established within the Office of Student Achievement the Georgia
339 Literacy Coach Coordinating Committee. Such committee shall comprise, at a minimum,
340 the Georgia Literacy Coach, the Coordinator of Georgia Literacy Coaching, a
341 representative of the Department of Education, at least one representative of Georgia's
342 regional education services agencies, a representative of a research based education
343 organization with subject matter expertise identified by the Georgia Council on Literacy,
344 and other subject matter experts identified by the Georgia Literacy Coach or the Georgia
345 Council on Literacy.
346 (2) The Office of Student Achievement shall employ:
347 (A) The Georgia Literacy Coach; and
348 (B) The Coordinator of Georgia Literacy Coaching, who shall be responsible for:
349 (i) Serving as the chairperson of the Georgia Literacy Coach Coordinating
350 Committee;
351 (ii) Coordinating state-wide literacy coaching efforts;
352 (iii) Serving as the primary liaison with the Department of Education with respect to
353 state-wide literacy coaching efforts;
354 (iv) Direction and oversight of literacy coaches affiliated with the Department of
355 Education or a regional education service agency whose positions are supported with
356 state or federal funds; and
357 (v) Coordinating with designated organizations affiliated with the Georgia Council
358 on Literacy with respect to research, best practices, and proactive intervention
359 strategies for birth to adult language and literacy learning.
- 14 -

25 LC 49 2352S
360 (e)(f) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to abrogate or otherwise affect the
361 operation or application of the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA)
362 or Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973.
363 (f)(g) This Code section shall not be subject to waivers pursuant to Code Section 20-2-82
364 for a strategic waivers school system, Code Section 20-2-244 for a local board of
365 education, Code Section 20-2-2063.2 for a charter system, or Code Section 20-2-2065 for
366 a charter school established pursuant to Article 31 or Article 31A of this chapter, a charter
367 system, or schools within a charter system, or any state special school."
368 SECTION 1-3.
369 Said title is further amended in said part by repealing Code Section 20-2-159.6, relating to
370 screening for dyslexia and related disorders, training and professional development, pilot
371 program evaluating early intervention, and data reporting.
372 PART II
373 SECTION 2-1.
374 Said title is further amended in Article 4 of Chapter 1, relating to Council on Literacy, by
375 revising paragraph (2) of Code Section 20-1-40, relating to definitions, as follows:
376 "(2) 'Evidence based literacy instruction methods and curricula' means instructional
377 materials, instructional practices, and curricula that are scientifically based reading
378 instruction, or multisensory language instruction, including oral language development,
379 phonological awareness, and phonics instruction that includes decoding and encoding,
380 fluency, writing, vocabulary, reading, and comprehension. Instructional materials that
381 feature or promote the use of the three-cueing system, as such term is defined in Code
382 Section 20-2-153.1, shall not constitute high-quality instructional materials."
- 15 -

25 LC 49 2352S
383 SECTION 2-2.
384 Said title is further amended in said article by revising Code Section 20-1-41, relating to
385 council created, as follows:
386 "20-1-41.
387 There is established the Georgia Council on Literacy for the purpose of conducting
388 comprehensive reviews of birth to postsecondary programs, the alignment of state support
389 for such programs, and other issues related to improving the literacy outcomes of Georgia
390 students and adults."
391 SECTION 2-3.
392 Said title is further amended in said article by revising subsection (c) of Code Section
393 20-1-43, relating to meetings, executive committee of voting members, and expenses, as
394 follows:
395 "(c) Legislative members of the council shall receive the allowances provided for in Code
396 Section 28-1-8. Nonlegislative members of the council shall receive a daily expense
397 allowance in the amount specified in subsection (b) (a) of Code Section 45-7-21 as well as
398 the mileage or transportation allowance authorized for state employees. Members of the
399 council who are state officials, other than legislative members, or state employees shall
400 receive no compensation for their services on the council, but shall be reimbursed for
401 expenses incurred by them in the performance of their duties as members of the council in
402 the same manner as they are reimbursed for expenses in their capacities as state officials
403 or state employees. The funds necessary for the reimbursement of the expenses of state
404 officials, other than legislative members, and state employees shall come from funds
405 appropriated to or otherwise available to their respective departments. All other funds
406 necessary to carry out the provisions of this article shall come from funds appropriated to
407 the Senate and the House of Representatives."
- 16 -

25 LC 49 2352S
408 SECTION 2-4.
409 Said title is further amended in said article by revising paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of
410 Code Section 20-1-44, relating to duties and authority relative to the Georgia Council on
411 Literacy, as follows:
412 "(1) Work in partnership with the State Board of Education and the Department of
413 Education to implement the requirements of the Georgia Early Literacy and Dyslexia Act
414 as provided for in Code Section 20-2-153.1;"
415 SECTION 2-5.
416 Said title is further amended in said article by revising Code Section 20-1-45, relating to
417 termination, as follows:
418 "20-1-45.
419 The council shall be abolished and this article shall stand repealed on December 31, 2026
420 2030."
421 SECTION 2-6.
422 Code Section 45-7-21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating expense allowance
423 and travel cost reimbursement for members of certain boards and commissions, is amended
424 by adding a new paragraph to subsection (a) to read as follows:
425 "(2.3) Georgia Council on Literacy;"
426 PART III
427 SECTION 3-1.
428 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
429 without such approval.
- 17 -

25 LC 49 2352S
430 SECTION 3-2.
431 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 18 -